src/fst/test/gt-norm2-yamls/V-II-miywâsin_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - miywâsin - help : # Wolvengrey VIIn
   
     miywâsin+V+II+Ind+3Sg:  miywâsin
     miywâsin+V+II+Ind+3Pl:  miywâsinwa
     miywâsin+V+II+Ind+4Sg:  miywâsiniyiw
     miywâsin+V+II+Ind+4Pl:  miywâsiniyiwa
     
     PV/ê+miywâsin+V+II+Cnj+3Sg:  [ê-miywâsik]
     PV/ê+miywâsin+V+II+Cnj+3Pl:  [ê-miywâsiki]
     PV/ê+miywâsin+V+II+Cnj+4Sg:  [ê-miywâsiniyik]
     PV/ê+miywâsin+V+II+Cnj+4Pl:  [ê-miywâsiniyiki]
     
     miywâsin+V+II+Fut+Cond+3Sg:  miywâsiki
     miywâsin+V+II+Fut+Cond+3Pl:  miywâsikwâwi
     miywâsin+V+II+Fut+Cond+4Sg:  miywâsiniyiki
     miywâsin+V+II+Fut+Cond+4Pl:  miywâsiniyikwâwi
